Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB443.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1210.1. Employment Leave for Voters.--An employer in this Commonwealth shall permit an employe who is qualified and registered to vote in an election time off necessary to vote, not to exceed two hours' absence from work, on the day of the election. The employer may specify the hours during which the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 employe may be absent to vote.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0443PN0373 - 2 - 12